Hawaii statutes.
[§132‑17] Novelty lighters;
prohibited; penalties. (a) No person shall sell, offer for sale, or
otherwise distribute any novelty lighter within the State.

(b) As used in this section, "novelty
lighter" means a handheld device that is designed to use fuel to produce
flame for the ignition of cigarettes, cigars, or pipes, and has a design that
would make it particularly attractive to children ten years of age or younger.

"Novelty lighter" includes but is not
limited to lighters that:

(1) Depict or resemble cartoon characters, toys,
guns, watches, games, musical instruments, vehicles, animals, food, or
beverages;

(2) Produce sounds or music;

(3) Have flashing lights or illumination; or

(4) Any combination of the above.

(c) This section shall not apply to the
following:

(1) Novelty lighters that are manufactured in the
State or transported through the State, exclusively for sale, offer for sale,
or distribution outside the State;

(2) Any lighter manufactured prior to 1980 or any
lighter that lacks fuel or a component necessary to produce flame or
combustion; and

(3) Standard disposable and refillable lighters that
are printed or decorated with logos, labels, decals, or artwork, or heat
shrinkable sleeves.

(d) Any person who violates this section shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned for not more than one year
or fined not more than $1,000, or both. [L 2011, c 224, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next